Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.100

Effectuation—Withdrawal—Amendment.

(1) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the 10th member state.

(a) On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different from the model compact statute.

(b) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in RCW 28A.420.090.

(c) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in RCW 28A.420.060(3)(t) to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the compact.

(2) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of member states should be less than 10.

(3) Any state that joins the compact after the commission's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state, as the rules and bylaws may be amended as provided in this compact.

(4) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same.

(a) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six months after enactment of the repealing statute.

(b) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of chapter 317, Laws of 2024 prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

(5) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.

[ 2024 c 317 s 11.]